Hawaii statutes.
[§179D-25] Establishment of dam and
reservoir safety special fund. (a) There is established in the department
a special fund, to be designated the dam and reservoir safety special fund.
The fund shall be administered by the board. The following shall be deposited
into the dam and reservoir safety special fund:

(1) Appropriations by the legislature;

(2) All fees and administrative charges collected
under this chapter or any rule adopted thereunder;

(3) Moneys collected as fines or penalties imposed under
this chapter or any rule adopted thereunder;

(4) Moneys derived from public or private sources to
benefit dam and reservoir safety;

(5) Moneys collected in full or partial satisfaction
of liens created under this chapter;

(6) Any moneys collected from the sale of retail
items by the department relating to dam and reservoir safety;

(7) Any other moneys collected pursuant to this
chapter or any rules adopted thereunder; and

(8) Moneys derived from interest, dividends, or other
income from other sources.

(b) The board may expend moneys from the dam
and reservoir safety special fund for:

(1) Conducting investigations, research, and the
collection of data, including technological advances made in dam and reservoir
safety practices elsewhere;

(2) Conducting investigations, monitoring, and
inspection programs and activities, and enforcement;

(3) Preparing and disseminating information to the
public concerning activities authorized under this chapter;

(4) Training and providing educational activities for
department staff and dam and reservoir owners;

(5) Employing any necessary remedial measures to
protect persons and property in accordance with this chapter;

(6) The costs and expenses of the coordination,
assistance, control, regulation, abatement, and inspection provided by this
chapter; and

(7) Other purposes for the administration of the dam
and reservoir safety program under this chapter or any rule adopted thereunder,
including but not limited to funding permanent or temporary positions that may
be appointed without regard to chapter 76.

The board shall provide coordination and assistance
to the proper state or county agency or agencies to control any dam, reservoir,
and appurtenances subject to section 179D-24 until they have been rendered safe
or the emergency has terminated.

(c) Moneys on balance in the dam and reservoir
safety special fund at the close of each fiscal year shall remain in that fund
and shall not be transferred or lapsed to the credit of the general fund. [L
2007, c 262, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next